Wisconsin, session 2025, AB403.
do enact as follows:AB403,11Section 1. 20.835 (2) (de) of the statutes is created to read:AB403,2,3220.835 (2) (de) Universal changing station credit. A sum sufficient to make 3the payments under ss. 71.07 (8m) (d) 2., 71.28 (8m) (d) 2., and 71.47 (8m) (d) 2.AB403,24Section 2. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,2,10571.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 6(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5i), (5j), (5k), 7(5r), (5rm), (6n), (8m), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 8liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 9partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 1071.34 (1k) (g).AB403,311Section 3. 71.07 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:AB403,2,131271.07 (8m) Universal changing station credit. (a) Definitions. In this 13subsection:AB403,2,17141. “Claimant” means a sole proprietor, a partner of a partnership, a member 15of a limited liability company, or a shareholder of a tax-option corporation who files 16a claim under this subsection and meets either of the following conditions during 17the preceding taxable year:AB403,2,1818a. Had gross receipts that did not exceed $1,000,000.AB403,2,1919b. Employed no more than 30 full-time employees.AB403,2,21202. “Full-time employee” means an individual who is employed for at least 30 21hours per week for 20 or more calendar weeks during a taxable year.AB403,2,22223. “Universal changing station” has the meaning given in s. 101.129 (1) (f).AB403,3,323(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, 24subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 1credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, an 2amount equal to 50 percent of the amount the claimant paid during the taxable 3year to install a universal changing station.AB403,3,54(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be claimed under this subsection unless the 5universal changing station meets the requirements of s. 101.129 (3).AB403,3,662. The credit claimed under this subsection may not exceed $5,125.AB403,3,1373. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 8not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the amount of, 9the credit are based on the amounts paid by the entity. A partnership, limited 10liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of credit that 11each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall provide that 12information to each of them. Partners, members, and shareholders may claim the 13credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB403,3,1514(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 15credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB403,3,20162. If the allowable amount of the claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax 17otherwise due under this chapter or no tax is due under this chapter, the amount of 18the claim not used to offset the tax due shall be certified by the department of 19revenue to the department of administration for payment by check, share draft, or 20other draft drawn from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (2) (de).AB403,421Section 4. 71.10 (4) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,4,72271.10 (4) (i) The total of claim of right credit under s. 71.07 (1), farmland 23preservation credit under ss. 71.57 to 71.61, farmland preservation credit, 2010 and 1beyond under s. 71.613, homestead credit under subch. VIII, jobs tax credit under s. 271.07 (3q), business development credit under s. 71.07 (3y), research credit under s. 371.07 (4k) (e) 2. a., veterans and surviving spouses property tax credit under s. 471.07 (6e), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.07 (3w), electronics and 5information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 71.07 (3wm), universal 6changing station credit under s. 71.07 (8m), earned income tax credit under s. 71.07 7(9e), estimated tax payments under s. 71.09, and taxes withheld under subch. X.AB403,58Section 5. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,4,12971.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 1071.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 11(5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8m), and (10) and passed through to partners 12shall be added to the partnership’s income.AB403,613Section 6. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,4,191471.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 15(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), 16(5rm), (6n), (8m), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 17liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 18partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 19s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).AB403,720Section 7. 71.28 (8m) of the statutes is created to read:AB403,4,222171.28 (8m) Universal changing station credit. (a) Definitions. In this 22subsection:AB403,4,24231. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection and 24meets either of the following conditions during the preceding taxable year:AB403,5,11a. Had gross receipts that did not exceed $1,000,000.AB403,5,22b. Employed no more than 30 full-time employees.AB403,5,432. “Full-time employee” means an individual who is employed for at least 30 4hours per week for 20 or more calendar weeks during a taxable year.AB403,5,553. “Universal changing station” has the meaning given in s. 101.129 (1) (f).AB403,5,106(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, 7subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 8credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the amount of those taxes, an 9amount equal to 50 percent of the amount the claimant paid during the taxable 10year to install a universal changing station.AB403,5,1211(c) Limitations. 1. No credit may be claimed under this subsection unless the 12universal changing station meets the requirements of s. 101.129 (3).AB403,5,13132. The credit claimed under this subsection may not exceed $5,125.AB403,5,20143. Partnerships, limited liability companies, and tax-option corporations may 15not claim the credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and the amount of, 16the credit are based on the amounts paid by the entity. A partnership, limited 17liability company, or tax-option corporation shall compute the amount of credit that 18each of its partners, members, or shareholders may claim and shall provide that 19information to each of them. Partners, members, and shareholders may claim the 20credit in proportion to their ownership interests.AB403,5,2221(d) Administration. 1. Subsection (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the credit 22under sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB403,6,4232. If the allowable amount of the claim under par. (b) exceeds the tax 1otherwise due under this chapter or no tax is due under this chapter, the amount of 2the claim not used to offset the tax due shall be certified by the department of 3revenue to the department of administration for payment by check, share draft, or 4other draft drawn from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (2) (de).AB403,85Section 8. 71.30 (3) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,6,11671.30 (3) (f) The total of farmland preservation credit under subch. IX, jobs 7credit under s. 71.28 (3q), enterprise zone jobs credit under s. 71.28 (3w), electronics 8and information technology manufacturing zone credit under s. 71.28 (3wm), 9business development credit under s. 71.28 (3y), research credit under s. 71.28 (4) 10(k) 1., universal changing station credit under s. 71.28 (8m), and estimated tax 11payments under s. 71.29.AB403,912Section 9. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB403,6,161371.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 14corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 15(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5g), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8m), and (10) and passed 16through to shareholders.AB403,1017Section 10. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab403 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab403 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB403 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB403 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB403: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting